Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4225
Board; report; Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool Distributive Fund; created; use; investment; director; funding powers.

(1) Following the close of each calendar year, the board shall report the board's determination of the paid and incurred losses for the year, taking into account investment income and other appropriate gains and losses. The board shall distribute copies of the report to the director, the Governor, and each member of the Legislature.

(2) The Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool Distributive Fund is created. Commencing with the premium and related retaliatory taxes for the taxable year ending December 31, 2001, and for each taxable year thereafter, any premium and related retaliatory taxes imposed by section 44-150 or 77-908 paid by insurers writing health insurance in this state, except as otherwise set forth in subdivisions (1) and (2) of section 77-912, shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. The fund shall be used for the operation of and payment of claims made against the pool. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Funds held by the administering insurer as of December 31, 2000, shall be carried forward by the administering insurer for payment of claims, costs of operation, and any remaining refunds.

(3) The board shall make periodic estimates of the amount needed from the fund for payment of losses resulting from claims, including a reasonable reserve, and administrative, organizational, and interim operating expenses and shall notify the director of the amount needed and the justification of the board for the request.

(4) The director shall approve all withdrawals from the fund and may determine when and in what amount any additional withdrawals may be necessary from the fund to assure the continuing financial stability of the pool.

(5) No later than May 1, 2002, and each May 1 thereafter, after funding of the net loss from operation of the pool for the prior premium and related retaliatory tax year, taking into account the policyholder premiums, account investment income, claims, costs of operation, and other appropriate gains and losses, the director shall transmit any money remaining in the fund as directed by section 77-912, disregarding the provisions of subdivisions (1) through (3) of such section. Interest earned on money in the fund shall be credited proportionately in the same manner as premium and related retaliatory taxes set forth in section 77-912.

(6) By June 30, 2001, the State Treasurer shall transfer three million one hundred sixty-five thousand two hundred sixty-five dollars from the Department of Insurance Cash Fund to the General Fund.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 25;

Laws 1991, LB 419, § 3;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 38;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 27.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.